Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202610-110
County bonds; retirement; taxes; levy and collection; duties of county officers.

The county clerk shall ascertain from the assessment roll of the county the amount of taxable property in such county and the percentage required to be levied thereon to pay the interest and to create a sinking fund. The county board shall levy such percentage upon the taxable property of the county, and the county clerk shall place the same upon the tax roll of the county in a separate column or columns, designating the purposes for which the taxes are levied. The taxes shall be collected by the county treasurer in the same manner that other taxes are collected.

Laws 1875, § 5, p. 171;

R.S.1913, § 375;

C.S.1922, § 292;

C.S.1929, § 11-111;

R.S.1943, § 10-110;

Laws 2001, LB 420, § 5;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 42.

Sinking fund tax is levied for public loans, not for floating indebtedness. Union P. Ry. Co. v. York County, 10 Neb. 612, 7 N.W. 270 (1880); Union P. R. R. Co. v. Buffalo County, 9 Neb. 449, 4 N.W. 53 (1880).